North Dakota statutes. TITLE 10 Corporations
CHAPTER 10-04 Supervision of Issue and Sale of Securities
10-04-06.
Exempt transactions.

Except as hereinafter in this section expressly provided, sections 10-04-04, 10-04-07.1, 10-04-07.2, 10-04-08, 10-04-08.4, and 10-04-10 do not apply to any of the following transactions:

A transaction by an executor, administrator of an estate, sheriff, marshal, receiver, guardian, conservator, or trustee in bankruptcy.

The sale, in good faith and not for the purpose of avoiding the provisions of this chapter, by a pledgee of securities pledged for a bona fide debt.

An isolated sale of any security made by or on behalf of a bona fide owner for the owner’s account, such owner not being an issuer, underwriter, broker-dealer, or agent and such sale not being made in the course of repeated and successive transactions of a like character. This subsection shall not exempt any broker-dealer or agent participating in an isolated sale from registering in accordance with section 10-04-10.

A transaction by an issuer for:

Securities dividends or other distributions by a corporation, cooperative, limited partnership, limited liability limited partnership, or limited liability company out of its earnings or surplus; or

The sale or distribution of additional capital stock of a corporation or cooperative, interest of a partnership, or membership interest of a limited liability company to or among its own stockholders, partners, or members.

A sale or offer to sell to:

An institutional investor;

A federal covered investment adviser; or

Any other person exempted by rule adopted or order issued by the commissioner.

Any transaction incident to a vote by stockholders, partners, or members pursuant to the articles of incorporation, bylaws, partnership agreement, articles of organization, member-control agreement, or the applicable corporation, partnership, or limited liability company statute on a merger, consolidation, exchange of securities, or sale of corporate, partnership, or limited liability company assets in consideration of the issuance of securities of another corporation, partnership, or limited liability company, other reorganization to which the issuer, or its parent or subsidiary and the other person or its parent or subsidiary, are parties, or any transaction incident to a judicially approved reorganization in which a security is issued in exchange for one or more outstanding securities, claims, or property interests, or partly in such exchange and partly for cash, or the solicitation of tenders of securities by an offeror in a tender offer in compliance with rule 162 adopted under the Securities Act of 1933.

A transaction under an offer to existing securityholders of the issuer, including persons that at the date of the transaction are holders of convertible securities, options, or warrants, if a commission or other remuneration, other than a standby commission, is not paid or given, directly or indirectly, for soliciting a securityholder in this state.

A nonissuer transaction by or through a broker-dealer and agent, both of which are registered or exempt from registration under this chapter, or a resale transaction by a sponsor of a unit investment trust registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940, in a security of a class that has been outstanding in the hands of the public for at least ninety days, if, at the date of the transaction:

The issuer of the security is engaged in business, the issuer is not in the organizational stage or in bankruptcy or receivership, and the issuer is not a blank check, blind pool, or shell company that has no specific business plan or purpose or has indicated that its primary business plan is to engage in a merger or combination of the business with, or an acquisition of, an unidentified person;

Such securities are sold at prices reasonably related to the current market price;

Such securities do not constitute the whole or part of an unsold allotment to, or subscription or participation by, the broker-dealer as an underwriter of the security or a redistribution;

Such securities are listed in Mergent’s Industrial Manual, Mergent’s Bank and Finance Manual, Mergent’s Transportation Manual, Mergent’s Public Utility Manual, or Fitch investor service, incorporated, are on the OTCQX or OTCQB markets operated by OTC Markets Group Incorporated, or are filed under section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 [ch. 404, title I, sec. 1; 48 Stat. 881; 15 U.S.C. 78 et seq.]; and

Any one of the following requirements is met:

The issuer of the security has a class of equity securities listed on a national securities exchange registered under section 6 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 or designated for trading on the national association of securities dealers automated quotation system;

The issuer of the security is a unit investment trust registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940;

The issuer of the security, including its predecessors, has been engaged in continuous business for at least three years; or

The issuer of the security has total assets of at least two million dollars based on an audited balance sheet as of a date within eighteen months before the date of the transaction or, in the case of a reorganization or merger when the parties to the reorganization or merger each had the audited balance sheet, a pro forma balance sheet for the combined organization.

Any transaction pursuant to an offer directed by the offeror to not more than thirty-five persons, other than those designated in subsection 5, in this state during any period of twelve consecutive months, whether or not the offeror or any of the offerees is then present in this state, if all of the following conditions are met:

The seller reasonably believes that all the buyers in this state, other than those designated in subsection 5, are purchasing for investment.

Except for offers or sales with respect to persons designated in subsection 5, no security may be offered or sold under this subdivision except through or by a broker-dealer and agent registered in accordance with section 10-04-10, unless it is offered and sold through an officer, director, governor, or partner of the issuer and no commission or other remuneration is paid, either directly or indirectly.

The offeror applies for and obtains the written approval of the commissioner prior to making any offers in this state and pays a nonrefundable filing fee of one hundred fifty dollars, which fee must accompany the application for approval.

Any offer or sale in this state of common stock, preferred stock, limited liability company membership interests, or limited partnership interests of an issuer during any period of twelve consecutive months if all of the following conditions are met:

The issuer reasonably believes that all the buyers in this state, other than those designated in subsection 5, are purchasing for investment.

Except with respect to offers and sales made to persons designated in subsection 5, no security may be sold under this subdivision except through or by a broker-dealer and agent registered in accordance with section 10-04-10, unless it is offered and sold through an officer, director, governor, or partner of the issuer and no commission or other remuneration is paid, either directly or indirectly.

The issuer is both organized under the laws of this state and has its principal place of business in this state.

No public advertising matter or general solicitation, except tombstone advertisements approved by the commissioner, is used in connection with any offers or sales.

An offering disclosure document in the form approved by the commissioner must be delivered to each offeree prior to the sale of the security.

The gross proceeds of the offering may not exceed five million dollars.

The issuer must apply for and obtain the written approval of the commissioner prior to making any offer or sale in this state by filing an application prescribed by the commissioner, a copy of the offering disclosure document, and any other information or documents the commissioner may require, together with a nonrefundable filing fee of one hundred fifty dollars.

All funds raised in the offering are placed in an escrow account until the total offering amount has been sold.

The issuer must file a report of all offers and sales made in this state pursuant to subdivision a or b on a form prescribed by the commissioner within thirty days after the completion of the offering or expiration of the twelve-month approval period, whichever occurs first.

The exemptions provided under subdivisions a and b may not be combined.

An exemption under this subsection is not available for the securities of any issuer if the issuer or any promoter, officer, director, manager, partner, or underwriter of the issuer:

Has filed a registration statement that is the subject of a currently effective registration stop order entered pursuant to any federal or state securities law within five years prior to the filing of the application required under this exemption.

Has been convicted within five years prior to the filing of the application required under this exemption of any felony or misdemeanor in connection with the offer, purchase, or sale of any security or any felony involving fraud or deceit, including forgery, embezzlement, obtaining money under false pretenses, larceny, or conspiracy to defraud.

Is currently subject to any state administrative enforcement order or judgment entered by any state securities administrator or the securities and exchange commission within five years prior to the filing of the application required under this exemption or is subject to any federal or state administrative enforcement order or judgment in which fraud or deceit, including making untrue statements of material facts, was found and the order of judgment was entered within five years prior to the filing of the application required under this exemption.

Is subject to any federal or state administrative enforcement order or judgment which prohibits, denies, or revokes the use of any exemption from registration in connection with the offer, purchase, or sale of securities.

Is currently subject to any order, judgment, or decree of any court of competent jurisdiction temporarily or preliminarily restraining or enjoining, or is subject to any order, judgment, or decree of any court of competent jurisdiction, permanently restraining or enjoining, such part from engaging in or continuing any conduct or practice in connection with the purchase or sale of a security or involving the making of any false filing with any state or with the securities and exchange commission entered within five years prior to the filing of the application required under this exemption.

Has been or is the subject of any order issued by the United States postal service that was entered within five years prior to reliance on this exemption and alleged any fraudulent or unlawful conduct.

Subdivision e does not apply if the commissioner determines, upon a showing of good cause, that it is not necessary under the circumstances that the exemption should not be denied.

The sale of capital stock of a corporation or membership interests of a limited liability company if the corporation or limited liability company is organized under the statutes of this state or the sale of memberships, including dues, in a nonprofit corporation incorporated in North Dakota if the corporation or limited liability company is organized and operated for the primary purpose of promoting community development.

Any security issued in connection with an employees’ stock purchase, savings, option, profit-sharing, pension, or similar employees’ benefit plan, including any securities, plan interests, and guarantees issued under a compensatory benefit plan or compensation contract, contained in a record, established by the issuer, its parents, its majority-owned subsidiaries, or the majority-owned subsidiaries of the issuer’s parent for the participation of their employees, including offers or sales of such securities to:

Directors; general partners; trustees, if the issuer is a business trust; officers; consultants; and advisers;

Family members who acquire such securities from those persons through gifts or domestic relations orders;

Former employees, directors, general partners, trustees, officers, consultants, and advisers if those individuals were employed by or providing services to the issuer when the securities were offered; and

Insurance agents who are exclusive insurance agents of the issuer, or the issuer’s subsidiaries or parents, or who derive more than fifty percent of their annual income from those organizations.

The sale of a security issued by the United States, or the state of North Dakota, or any political subdivision or instrumentality of the state of North Dakota; provided, that the offer for sale and sale are made by an official or employee of the issuer or of the Bank of North Dakota acting in an official capacity and not for personal pecuniary profit, or by a bank or similar financial association or institution or an official or employee thereof solely as an accommodation to customers of such association or institution and without asking or receiving a commission or remuneration other than an accommodation fee not to exceed one hundred dollars in connection with the transaction.

Any offer or sale of shares of capital stock issued by a professional corporation, professional limited liability company, or professional limited liability partnership which is organized and operated pursuant to chapter 10-31.

The offer or sale of a security issued by North Dakota united dues credit trust to members of North Dakota united.

An offer, but not a sale, of a security made by or on behalf of an issuer for the sole purpose of soliciting an indication of interest in receiving a prospectus or similar disclosure document for the security if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

The issuer is or will be a business entity organized under the laws of one of the states or possessions of the United States or one of the provinces or territories of Canada; is engaged in or proposes to engage in a business other than petroleum exploration or production, mining, or other extractive industries; and is not a blind pool offering or other offering for which the specific business or properties cannot now be described.

The issuer may solicit indications of interest in a project or business only within a period of twelve months after receiving approval from the commissioner and does not pay a commission or fee to any person for soliciting a potential investor or prospective purchaser in this state unless the person who receives the commission or fee is registered as a broker-dealer or agent in this state.

The issuer intends to register securities in this state, rely upon subsection 8 of section 10-04-05 for the issuance of a security, or receive approval for an exemption under subsection 5 of section 10-04-05 or subsection 9 of this section.

The issuer files a solicitation of interest form and copies of any advertising or marketing materials, including scripts for use in telephone, television, electronic, or computer publications, for approval by the commissioner at least ten business days before the issuer begins soliciting indications of interest from potential purchasers and at least ten business days before publishing or distributing any materials or information to any person.

The issuer obtains approval of the commissioner for any amendments or changes in filed forms, marketing materials, or advertisements at least ten business days before distributing the amended marketing materials or amended advertising information to any person.

The issuer does not use any solicitation of interest form, script, advertisement, or other material which the issuer has been notified by the commissioner not to distribute, to solicit indications of interest.

Except for scripted broadcasts and published notices, the issuer does not communicate with any offeree about the contemplated offering unless the offeree is provided with the most current solicitation of interest form at or before the time of the communication or within five days from the communication.

The issuer stops all communications with prospective investors made in reliance on this exemption immediately after filing an application to register or qualify the securities with the commissioner or with the securities and exchange commission.

The issuer does not accept money or sign completed contracts for sales of securities with any person while soliciting indications of interest and does not complete any sales of securities until at least ten business days after completing a securities registration or approval to offer and sell securities in this state.

The issuer does not make a sale until three days after delivery to the purchaser of a prospectus or similar disclosure document.

The issuer does not know, and in the exercise of reasonable care could not know, that the issuer or any officer, director, manager, ten percent shareholder, promoter, partner, or agent of the issuer:

Has been the subject of or filed a registration statement that is the subject of a stop order, administrative enforcement order, judgment, injunction, or restraining order issued by any federal or state securities agency, any court of competent jurisdiction, or the United States postal service and which prohibits, denies, or revokes the registration or use of any exemption from registration in connection with the offer, sale, or purchase of a security, franchise, commodity, or other financial transaction or which involves fraud, deceit, misstatements of material facts, forgery, embezzlement, obtaining money under false pretenses, larceny, conspiracy to defraud, or similar deceptive acts within five years prior to the filing of the solicitation of interest form; or

Has been convicted of any felony or misdemeanor involving the offer, purchase, or sale of a security, franchise, commodity, or financial transaction, or any felony or misdemeanor involving fraud, deceit, forgery, embezzlement, conspiracy to defraud, or a similar financial crime.

The issuer shall comply with the requirements set forth below. Failure to comply will not result in the loss of the exemption from the requirements of section 10-04-04, but is a violation of this chapter, is actionable by the commissioner under section 10-04-16, and constitutes grounds for denying or revoking the exemption as to a specific security or transaction.

Any published notice must contain at least the identity of the chief executive officer of the issuer, a brief and general description of its business and products, and the following legends:

NO MONEY OR OTHER CONSIDERATION IS BEING SOLICITED AND NONE WILL BE ACCEPTED;

NO SALES OF THE SECURITIES WILL BE MADE OR COMMITMENT TO PURCHASE ACCEPTED UNTIL DELIVERY OF A PROSPECTUS OR SIMILAR DISCLOSURE DOCUMENT THAT INCLUDES COMPLETE INFORMATION ABOUT THE ISSUER AND THE OFFERING;

AN INDICATION OF INTEREST MADE BY A PROSPECTIVE INVESTOR INVOLVES NO OBLIGATION OR COMMITMENT OF ANY KIND; and

THIS OFFER IS BEING MADE PURSUANT TO AN EXEMPTION FROM REGISTRATION UNDER THE FEDERAL AND STATE SECURITIES LAWS. NO SALE MAY BE MADE UNTIL THE OFFERING STATEMENT IS QUALIFIED BY THE SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION AND IS REGISTERED OR APPROVED IN THIS STATE.

Any script for broadcast must contain at least the identity of the chief executive of the issuer, a brief description of its business and products, its address and telephone number, and the following legends:

THIS IS FOR AN INDICATION OF INTEREST ONLY AND INVOLVES NO OBLIGATION OR COMMITMENT OF ANY KIND UPON A PROSPECTIVE INVESTOR;

NO MONEY OR OTHER CONSIDERATION IS BEING SOLICITED; and

THIS OFFER IS MADE PURSUANT TO AN EXEMPTION FROM REGISTRATION UNDER FEDERAL AND STATE SECURITIES LAWS.

Is currently subject to any order, judgment, or decree of any court of competent jurisdiction, entered within the last five years, temporarily, preliminarily, or permanently restraining or enjoining such party from engaging in or continuing to engage in any conduct or practice involving fraud or deceit in connection with the purchase or sale of any security.

Offers made on reliance of this exemption will not result in a violation of section 10-04-04 by virtue of being integrated with subsequent offers or sales of securities unless such subsequent offers and sales would be integrated under federal securities laws.

An offer or sale of common stock, limited liability company membership interests, or limited partnership interests by a person to a person or other subscribers, not exceeding ten in number, for the sole purpose of organization in this state, if the securities are not acquired for the purpose of resale to others for a period of twelve months, advertising has not been published or circulated in connection with the offer or sale, and all sales are consummated within ten days after the date of organization.

Any offer or sale of a security by an issuer in a transaction provided all of the following conditions are met:

Sales of securities may be made only to persons who are, or the issuer reasonably believes are, accredited investors as defined in 17 CFR 230.501(a) promulgated by the securities and exchange commission.

The exemption is not available to an issuer that is in the development stage that either has no specific business plan or purpose or has indicated that its business plan is to engage in a merger or acquisition with an unidentified company or companies, or other entity or person.

The issuer reasonably believes that all purchasers are purchasing for investment and not with the view to, or for, sale in connection with a distribution of the security. Any resale of a security sold in reliance of this exemption within twelve months of sale must be presumed to be with a view to distribution and not for investment, except a resale pursuant to a registration statement effective under section 10-04-04 or to an accredited investor pursuant to an exemption available under subsection 5.

The exemption is not available to an issuer if the issuer, any of the issuer’s predecessors, any affiliated issuer, any of the issuer’s directors, officers, general partners, beneficial owners of ten percent or more of any class of its equity securities, any of the issuer’s promoters presently connected with the issuer in any capacity, any underwriter of the securities to be offered, or any partner, director, or officer of such underwriter:

Paragraph 1 does not apply if:

The party subject to the disqualification is licensed or registered to conduct securities-related business in the state in which the order, judgment, or decree creating the disqualification was entered against such party;

Before the first offer under this exemption, the state securities administrator, or the court or regulatory authority that entered the order, judgment, or decree, waives the disqualification; or

The issuer establishes that it did not know and in the exercise of reasonable care, based on a factual inquiry, could not have known that a disqualification existed under this subdivision.

A general announcement of the proposed offering may be made by any means.

The general announcement must include only the following information, unless additional information is specifically permitted by the commissioner:

The name, address, and telephone number of the issuer of the securities;

The name, a brief description, and price, if known, of any security to be issued;

A brief description of the business of the issuer in twenty-five words or less;

The type, number, and aggregate amount of securities being offered;

The name, address, and telephone number of the person to contact for additional information; and

A statement that:

Sales will only be made to accredited investors;

No money or other consideration is being solicited or will be accepted by way of this general announcement; and

The securities have not been registered with or approved by any state securities agency or the securities and exchange commission and are being offered and sold pursuant to an exemption from registration.

The issuer, in connection with an offer, may provide information in addition to the general announcement under subdivision e, if such information:

Is delivered through an electronic database that is restricted to persons who have been prequalified as accredited investors; or

Is delivered after the issuer reasonably believes that the prospective purchaser is an accredited investor.

Telephone solicitation is not permitted unless prior to placing the call, the issuer reasonably believes that the prospective purchaser to be solicited is an accredited investor.

Dissemination of the general announcement of the proposed offering to persons who are not accredited investors does not disqualify the issuer from claiming the exemption.

The issuer shall file with the department a notice of transaction, a consent to service of process, a copy of the general announcement, and a nonrefundable filing fee of one hundred dollars within fifteen days after the first sale in this state.

The security offered or sold under this subsection is offered or sold by a broker-dealer and agent registered in accordance with section 10-04-10, or offered and sold through an officer, director, governor, or partner of the issuer and no commission or other remuneration is paid.

The offer or sale of a security issued by an organization organized under and operated in compliance with chapter 10-06.1.

Any offer or sale of an agricultural-related cooperative security by or on behalf of an agricultural producer, as defined by section 32-44-01, to a person for the purpose of producing and selling agricultural products, as defined by section 32-44-01, to the cooperative. Commissions or other remuneration may not be paid or given directly or indirectly for soliciting any prospective buyer in this state, except to a broker-dealer or agent registered in this state, to an agent of a bank or a commercial trust department, to a licensed real estate agent, or to a licensed auctioneer if the sale is made at a bona fide public auction.

A transaction in a note, bond, debenture, or other evidence of indebtedness secured by a mortgage or other security agreement if:

The note, bond, debenture, or other evidence of indebtedness is offered and sold with the mortgage or other security agreement as a unit;

A general solicitation or general advertisement of the transaction is not made; and

A commission or other remuneration is not paid or given, directly or indirectly, to a person not registered under this chapter as a broker-dealer or as an agent.

A nonissuer transaction by a federal covered investment adviser with investments under management in excess of one hundred million dollars acting in the exercise of discretionary authority in a signed record for the account of others.

The commissioner may, as to any security or transaction or any type of security or transaction, withdraw or further condition this exemption, or increase or decrease the number of offerees permitted, or waive the condition in paragraph 1.

The commissioner may withdraw or further condition this exemption or waive the conditions in paragraphs 5 and 6.

The prohibitions listed above shall not apply if the person subject to the disqualification is duly licensed or registered to conduct securities-related business in the state in which the administrative order or judgment was entered against such person or if the broker-dealer employing such party is licensed or registered in this state and the form B-D filed with this state discloses the order, conviction, judgment, or decree relating to such person. A person disqualified under this subsection may not act in a capacity other than that for which the person is licensed or registered. Any disqualification caused by this section is automatically waived if the agency, which created the basis for disqualification, determines upon a showing of good cause that it is not necessary under the circumstances that the exemption be denied.

(a)

Within the last five years, has filed a registration statement that is the subject of a currently effective registration stop order entered by any state securities administrator or the securities and exchange commission;

(b)

Within the last five years, has been convicted of any criminal offense in connection with the offer, purchase, or sale of any security, or involving fraud or deceit;

(c)

Is currently subject to any state or federal administrative enforcement order or judgment, entered within the last five years, finding fraud or deceit in connection with the purchase or sale of any security; or

Source:

S.L. 1951, ch. 106, § 6; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-0406; S.L. 1959, ch. 110, § 3; 1961, ch. 117, § 4; 1963, ch. 102, § 2; 1965, ch. 95, § 2; 1967, ch. 87, § 2; 1969, ch. 125, §§ 1, 2; 1969, ch. 126, § 1; 1973, ch. 81, §§ 4, 6; 1977, ch. 83, § 2; 1981, ch. 132, § 3; 1981, ch. 133, § 1; 1983, ch. 129, § 1; 1985, ch. 140, § 4; 1985, ch. 141, § 1; 1985, ch. 150, § 12; 1987, ch. 135, §§ 2, 3; 1987, ch. 141, § 27; 1989, ch. 123, § 4; 1989, ch. 124, § 1; 1991, ch. 97, § 2; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1993, ch. 86, § 2; 1995, ch. 107, § 4; 1997, ch. 101, § 2; 1999, ch. 50, § 5; 1999, ch. 92, § 5; 1999, ch. 94, § 1; 2001, ch. 109, §§ 2, 3, 4, 5, 6.; 2003, ch. 82, § 4; 2003, ch. 83, § 1; 2005, ch. 97, § 4; 2009, ch. 107, §§
2, 3; 2017, ch. 129, § 2, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 888, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 86, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

Note.

The Securities Act of 1933 referenced above is compiled at 15 USCS § 77a et seq.

The Securities Exchange Act of 1934 referenced above is compiled at 15 USCS § 78a et seq.

The Investment Company Act of 1940 referenced above is compiled at 15 USCS § 80a-1, et seq.

10-04-06.1.
Suspension and revocation of exemptions.

The commissioner may by order or regulation suspend or revoke any exemption under section 10-04-05 or 10-04-06 with respect to any specific security or transaction or may require with respect to any specific security or transaction, prior to the making of any offers or sales, such information with respect thereto or the security to be offered or sold thereunder or such reports after the making of such sales, as the commissioner may deem necessary to enable the commissioner to determine whether or not to suspend or revoke the exemption. No such order may be entered without appropriate prior notice to all interested parties, opportunity for hearing, and written findings of fact and conclusions of law, except that the commissioner may by order summarily suspend any of the specified exemptions pending final determination of any proceeding under this section. Upon the entry of a summary order, the commissioner shall promptly notify all interested parties that it has been entered and the reasons therefor and that within fifteen days of the receipt of a written request the matter will be set down for hearing. If no hearing is requested and none is ordered by the commissioner, the order will remain in effect until it is modified or vacated by the commissioner. If a hearing is requested or ordered, the commissioner, after notice of and opportunity for a hearing to all interested parties, may modify or vacate the order or extend it until final determination.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 81, § 1.

10-04-06.2.
Legacy fund investments — Notice filing.

Within thirty days of completion of the transaction, any issuer of securities in receipt of an investment from the legacy fund under paragraph 3 of subdivision a of subsection 3 of section 21-10-11 or under subdivision b of subsection 3 of section 21-10-11, shall file electronically a notice on a form prescribed by the commissioner and containing information as required by the commissioner.

The notice filing requirement under this section does not exempt the issuer from or supersede any other provision of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 15, § 26, effective July 1, 2021.

10-04-07.
Registration by description. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2005, ch. 97, § 22.

10-04-07.1.
Registration by announcement — Secondary.

Securities that have been outstanding and in the hands of the public for not less than one year as the result of prior original registration in North Dakota or through securities and exchange commission registration, by the issuer, or by the underwriter on behalf of an issuer, are entitled to registration by announcement in the manner and subject to the conditions provided by this section.

A balance sheet and an earnings statement showing statutory net earnings after all dividends (returned premiums) to policyholders and after all expenses including state and federal income taxes for the fiscal period ended not more than twelve months prior to the filing date upon which either an unqualified or a qualified opinion has been expressed by a certified public accountant; provided, however, that any qualification of opinion relates only to generally accepted principles of accounting which may have been modified to meet the reporting requirements of the various state insurance departments.

Such balance sheet separates the surplus account into its component parts and shows a positive balance in the accumulated unrestricted retained earnings account, on statutory basis.

Earnings statements for the four fiscal years immediately preceding the beginning date of the earnings statement required in subdivision a prepared by the same certified public accountant showing statutory net earnings after the deductions enumerated in subdivision a for each fiscal year; provided, however, that these statements need not be accompanied by an unqualified or a qualified opinion of the certified public accountant unless such certified public accountant did actually perform an audit of the company for any year or years covered by the earnings statements in which case the requirements of subdivision a apply for the year or years so audited.

A statement prepared by a certified public accountant or actuary showing a net gain in insurance in force for each of the last five fiscal years.

Securities entitled to registration by announcement may be registered only by a broker-dealer registered with the department as provided for in section 10-04-10 by filing with the department a written announcement of intention to trade in the securities containing the following:

Name of issuer and location of the headquarters or principal office.

A brief description of the security, including price and current earnings.

A statement that the securities have been outstanding and in the hands of the public not less than one year as aforesaid.

A balance sheet not more than twelve months old.

A statement that the security has been registered in North Dakota or by the securities and exchange commission.

The filing of such announcement with the department constitutes the registration of the security, unless advised to the contrary within forty-eight hours or advised to furnish additional information, and such broker-dealer shall pay to the commissioner a filing fee of twenty-five dollars. Upon registration, such securities may be sold in this state for a period of one year from date of registration by registered broker-dealers at a price or prices reasonably related to the current market price of such security at the time of sale, subject, however, to any and all rights and authority granted the commissioner and to any person or purchaser under chapter 10-04, in respect of securities registered by the commissioner by coordination or qualification. No security registered under this section shall be sold directly or indirectly for the benefit of the issuer, or an underwriter of such securities, or for the promotion of any scheme or enterprise with the intent of violating or evading any provision of this chapter; provided, that no security, the registration of which has been revoked by the commissioner, or application for registration of which has been denied by the commissioner, or withdrawn by the applicant, shall be registered under this section.

Securities registered pursuant to section 10-04-07.2 or 10-04-08 become eligible for trading in the secondary market at current market prices upon completion of the original offering when said securities are outstanding and in the hands of the public and remain so until the end of the registration year when renewal for secondary is permissible. Notification of completion of initial offering should be sent to the commissioner when the offering is completed requesting change to secondary.

In addition to the foregoing, stock, having equal voting rights with other classes, of life insurance companies may also qualify for registration under this section provided the company has been in continuous operation for twenty years immediately preceding the date of filing for registration and provided further that in addition to supplying the information required by subdivisions a through c of subsection 2 the applicant can supply all of the following:

Source:

S.L. 1961, ch. 117, § 5; 1965, ch. 95, § 3; 1973, ch. 81, § 5; 1999, ch. 92, § 6; 2003, ch. 82, § 6; 2005, ch. 97, §§ 5, 6; 2021, ch. 86, § 4, effective July 1, 2021.